Hawaii statutes.
[§200-12.5] Native Hawaiian canoes; education. (a)
In all state small boat harbors, the department shall accommodate the mooring
of native Hawaiian canoes owned or leased by a nonprofit corporation,
association, organization, or other duly chartered entity that operates native Hawaiian canoes for
educational purposes.

(b)
Any owner or lessee of a native Hawaiian canoe
accommodated under subsection (a) shall submit to the department an annual
report describing how the educational activities
that were conducted during the previous year used,
involved, or focused on the native Hawaiian canoe. The
report shall include:

(1) A description of each educational activity;

(2) The date of each educational activity; and

(3) The number of participants in each educational
activity.

(c)
The chairperson may adopt rules pursuant to chapter 91 to implement this
section. [L 2013, c 243, §2]

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next